Tennessee, session 114, SB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-7-302(a), is amended by deleting
the language "Personal Eligibility Conditions." and substituting:
Personal Eligibility Conditions. Notwithstanding this subsection (a) to the contrary,
upon declaration of an emergency pursuant to § 58-2-107, subdivisions (a)(3) and (4)
are suspended to the extent necessary to allow the commissioner the discretion to
amend such reporting requirements upon receiving appropriate federal guidance. Such
a suspension is limited to residents of this state who reside or work in counties for which
the state has requested a major disaster declaration.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-106(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(20) Be vested with the authority to assist political subdivisions and local
emergency management agencies with recovery from disasters and emergencies on
public property.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1317
000926
- 1 -